Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.630

Falsifying weight tickets, weight or count—Unlawfully delegating—Presealing before weighing.

It shall be unlawful for a weighmaster or weigher to falsify a certified weight ticket, or to cause an incorrect weight, measure, or count to be determined, or delegate his or her authority to any person not licensed as a weigher, or to preseal a eight ticket with his or her official seal before performing the act of weighing.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6112; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 34.]